Wisconsin, session 2025, AB875.
do enact as follows:AB875,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB875,29Section 2. 20.115 (7) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB875,2,131020.115 (7) (f) Soil and water management; climate change personnel. The 11amounts in the schedule for support of county land conservation personnel under 12the soil and water resource management program for the purpose described under 13s. 92.14 (3) (am).AB875,314Section 3. 92.14 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB875,2,231592.14 (3) Basic allocations to counties. (intro.) To help counties fund 16their land and water conservation activities, the department shall award an annual 17grant from the appropriation under s. 20.115 (7) (c), (f), (qe), or (qf) or s. 20.866 (2) 18(we) to any county land conservation committee that has a land and water resource 19management plan approved by the department under s. 92.10 (4) (d), and that, by 20county board action, has resolved to provide any matching funds required under 21sub. (5g). The county may use the grant for land and water resource management 22planning and for any of the following purposes, consistent with the approved land 23and water resource management plan:AB875,41Section 4. 92.14 (3) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB875,3,3292.14 (3) (am) County land conservation personnel who primarily focus on 3climate change and climate change resiliency.AB875,54Section 5. 92.14 (5r) of the statutes is amended to read:AB875,3,12592.14 (5r) Annual grant request. Every land conservation committee shall 6prepare annually a grant request that describes the land and water resource 7staffing needs and activities to be undertaken or funded by the county under this 8chapter and ss. 281.65 and 281.66 and the funding needed for those purposes. The 9grant request shall specifically state any request for funding for climate change 10personnel under sub. (3) (am). The grant request shall be consistent with the 11county’s plan under s. 92.10. The land conservation committee shall submit the 12grant request to the department.AB875,3,1313